Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-2625
Local ordinances and resolutions; preemption; regulatory functions; contracts authorized.

Except as specifically provided in the Pesticide Act, the provisions of the act shall preempt ordinances and resolutions by political subdivisions that prohibit or regulate any matter relating to the registration, labeling, distribution, sale, handling, use, application, or disposal of pesticides. The department may contract with a city of the metropolitan or primary class it deems qualified to conduct, on a case-by-case basis, any regulatory functions authorized pursuant to the act relating to the disposal of pesticides except those functions relating to the issuance, suspension, or revocation of permits or any order of probation, suspension, immediate suspension, or revocation.

Laws 1993, LB 588, § 4;

Laws 2002, LB 436, § 4.